Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 309.462 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[Effective January 1, 2023, no] person shall not represent himself or herself as a
community health worker unless he or she is certified as such in accordance with
the provisions of KRS 309.460 to 309.464.
(2) In order to be eligible to apply for community health worker certification, an
individual shall:
(a) Be a legal United States resident;
(b) 1. Be a resident of Kentucky; or
2. Be employed as a community health worker in the state of Kentucky;
(c) Be at least eighteen (18) years of age; and
(d) 1. Complete a competency-based community health worker training and
mentorship program offered by an organization approved by the
department to provide community health worker training and
mentorship; or
2. Meet requirements established by the department through the
promulgation of administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, for certification based on relevant and verifiable past
community health worker related work experience.
(3) Community health worker certifications shall be renewed every three (3)
years[annually and shall expire on October 31 of the year following the date of
certification or recertification].
(4) In order to be eligible for recertification, a certified community health worker shall
annually complete continuing education, as required by the department through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
related to the core competencies of community health work provided by an
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2034
organization approved by the department to provide continuing education for
certified community health workers. Administrative regulations promulgated
pursuant to this subsection shall include requirements for continuing education
related to oral health care, infant and maternal health care, and geriatric health care.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an individual shall be
eligible to earn college course credit for training, mentorship, and continuing
education completed pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:47 PM Jacketed